Hawaii statutes.
§142-30 Form of citation and summons.
(a) In issuing citations and summons for violations of this chapter, law
enforcement officers other than those described in section 142-29(2) shall use
the summons and complaint citation books issued by the judiciary for violations
of the traffic code.

(b) Citations issued by officers and employees
as described in section 142-29(2) shall use citation and summons forms that
shall warn the person to appear and answer the charge against the person at a
place and at a time within thirty days after the citation. The citation and
summons shall be so designed to include all necessary information to make it
valid and legal under the laws and rules of the State.

The citation and summons shall be in a form
that allows a carbon copy to be provided to the accused. The district courts
may provide for the disposition of the original and any other copies. Every
citation and summons shall be consecutively numbered and each carbon copy shall
bear the number of its respective original. [L 1972, c 86, pt of §1; am L 1986,
c 17, §1; am L 1997, c 62, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next